District of Columbia statutes.
2-1517.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Behavioral health” means a person’s overall social, emotional, and psychological well-being and development.

(2)

“Youth” means individuals under 18 years of age residing in the District and those individuals classified as youth in the custody of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services and the Child and Family Services Agency who are 21 years of age or younger.

June 7, 2012, D.C. Law 19-141, § 102, 59 DCR 3083
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s additional reporting requirements, see § 10007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s additional reporting requirements, see § 10007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s additional reporting requirements, see § 10007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 4111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle K of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “South Capitol Street Memorial Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 provided: “Sec. 601. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 originally provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7004, provided that the applicability of only §§ 302(b)(1), 304, and 502(a) are contingent upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7004 of D.C. Law 19-168 amended D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, to read as follows:

“Sec. 601. Applicability. Sections 302(b)(1), 304, and 502(a) shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 7016 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that Sections 7001, 7004, 7007, 7009, 7011, and 7015 of the act shall apply as of June 19, 2012.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 20-61, § 4112, provided that §§ 302(b)(1)(A) and (C) and 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 shall apply to public charter schools upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register. Section 302(b)(1)(A) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(A-i); Section 302(b)(1)(C) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(B-i); and Section 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 added 5 DCMR § A2103(c)(6).

Section 10007 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided: “Deputy Mayor for Education reporting requirements.

“By October 1, 2014, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall submit to the Council:

“(1) A report on its continued implementation of the South Capitol Street Memorial Amendment Act of 2012, effective June 7, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-141; D.C. Official Code Section 2-1517.01 et seq.), including a Fiscal Year 2015 spending plan;

“(2) Recommendations on expanding transportation subsidies to students between the ages of 21-24 years old enrolled in DCPS or a public charter school;

“(3) An update on the activities and Fiscal Year 2015 goals of the State Early Childhood Development Coordinating Council; and

“(4) A report on implementation of the Graduation Pathways Project and how it will identify students who are off-track, assess current programs, and create or expand programs in both sectors that have demonstrated success at reducing truancy and keeping students on track to graduate on time.”